Utah statutes.
59-2-214.   Commission to furnish forms for taxpayers' statements.

(1)  The commission shall furnish the assessor of each county with blank forms of statements provided under Section 59-2-306, affixing to the form a statement substantially as follows to be signed by the party completing the form:

I, ____, do swear that I am a resident of the county of ____, and that my post office address is ____; that the above list contains a full and correct statement of all property subject to taxation, which I, or any firm of which I am a member, or any corporation, association, or company of which I am president, cashier, secretary, or managing agent, owned, claimed, possessed, or controlled at 12 o'clock midnight on the preceding January 1 and which is not already assessed this year.

(2)  The signed statement made on behalf of a firm or corporation shall state the principal place of business of the firm or corporation, and in other respects shall conform substantially to the preceding form.



Amended by Chapter 86, 2000 General Session

